District of Columbia statutes.
41-101

Findings; purpose.

The District of Columbia currently lacks statutory authority to act as custodian for substantial sums of abandoned personal property within its jurisdiction. This chapter is intended to mandate the report and delivery by holders and to authorize the receipt for safekeeping and fiscal growth by the District of Columbia of any and all personal property which is abandoned, without regard either to any maximum length of time for which such property was abandoned or to any statute limiting the right to sue to claim such property.

Mar. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 3-160, § 101, 27 DCR 5150
Pursuant to Reorganization Plan No. 1 of 1992, effective July 7, 1992, all of the duties and functions of the Unclaimed Property Unit in the Department of Finance and Revenue established under the District of Columbia Uniform Disposition of Unclaimed Property Act § 42-201 et seq., the rules issued pursuant thereto and Mayor’s Order 81-82, dated March 27, 1981, 28 DCR 1740, which delegated to the Department of Finance and Revenue the Mayor’s authority to administer the act and to issue rules are hereby transferred to the Office of the District of Columbia Controller within the office of Financial Management. The existing Unclaimed Property Unit within the Department of Finance and Revenue is abolished.
1981 Ed., § 42-201.